District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.25

Misbehavior at proceedings.

If an individual does the following: (1) Disobeys or resists a lawful order or process in proceedings under this subchapter before the Mayor or his or her representative; or (2) misbehaves during a hearing or so near the place of hearing as to obstruct it, the Mayor or his or her representative shall certify the facts to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. The Court, in a summary manner, shall hear the evidence as to the acts complained of and, if the evidence warrants, punish the individual in the same manner and to the same extent as for a contempt committed before the Court, or commit the individual on the same conditions as if the forbidden act has occurred with reference to the process of or in the presence of the Court.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2325, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-624.25.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.25.